Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6008.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 40110b. (1) The legislature finds and declares that: (a) The wildlife populations of the state and their habitat are of paramount importance to the citizens of this state. (b) The sound management of wolf populations in this state is necessary, including the use of hunting as a management tool, to stabilize the populations of game species, minimize negative human and wolf encounters, and to prevent wolves from threatening or harming humans, livestock, and pets. (2) The legislature hereby authorizes the establishment of the first open season for wolf. (3) The Not later than 90 days after sections 1 and 3 of 2008 PA 290, MCL 324.95151 and 324.95153, are operational and enforceable, the commission may shall issue orders under section 40113a establishing annual wolf hunting and trapping seasons throughout the state. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S03935'25) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H03935'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.